District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.173

Administration of oaths.

The District of Columbia Auditor, or a delegate authorized by the Auditor, may administer oaths, affirmations, or take affidavits, whenever necessary to perform the duties of the Auditor.

Apr. 22, 2004, D.C. Law 15-146, § 4, 51 DCR 2597